Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2840
Prescription, defined.

Prescription means an order for a drug or device issued by a practitioner for a specific patient, for emergency use, or for use in immunizations. Prescription does not include a chart order.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 936.